New York, session 2025-2026, A3721.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The parks, recreation and historic preservation law is 2 amended by adding a new section 13.33 to read as follows: 3 § 13.33 Prohibition on use of recycled tires. The office or other 4 state agency having jurisdiction of any state park, parkway, recreation- 5 al facility or historic site shall not permit such state park, parkway, 6 recreational facility or historic site to contain any material which 7 contains recycled tires or any equipment which was made in part or in 8 whole using recycled tires. 9 § 2. Subdivision 2 of section 399-dd of the general business law, as 10 amended by section 38 of part A of chapter 62 of the laws of 2011, is 11 amended to read as follows: 12 2. The department of state, in consultation with the office of parks, 13 recreation and historic preservation, shall promulgate rules and regu- 14 lations for the design, installation, inspection and maintenance of 15 playgrounds and playground equipment. Those regulations shall substan- 16 tially comply with the guidelines and criteria which are contained in 17 the handbook for public playground safety produced by the United States 18 consumer products safety commission or any successor. The rules and 19 regulations shall include: 20 (a) special provisions for playgrounds appropriate for children within 21 the range of ages in day care settings. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD08066-01-5 A. 3721 2 1 (b) a prohibition on the sale, installation, and use of any material 2 which contains recycled tires or which was made in part or in whole 3 using recycled tires. 4 § 3. This act shall take effect one year after it shall have become a 5 law. Effective immediately, the addition, amendment and/or repeal of any 6 rule or regulation necessary for the implementation of this act on its 7 effective date are authorized to be made and completed on or before such 8 effective date.